Hawaii statutes.
§304A-2171 John A. Burns
school of medicine special fund. (a) There is established the John A.
Burns school of medicine special fund, to be administered and expended by the
University of Hawaii.

(b) The following shall be deposited into the
special fund:

(1) Appropriations by the legislature;

(2) Physician workforce assessment fees established
pursuant to section 453-8.8;

(3) Grants, donations, gifts, or other income
received for the purposes of the special fund; and

(4) Interest earned or accrued on moneys in the
special fund.

(c) [Repeal and reenactment on June 30,
2017. L 2012, c 186, §5.] Moneys in the special fund shall be used
to support the John A. Burns school of medicine's activities related to
physician workforce assessment and planning within Hawaii; provided that of the
physician workforce assessment fees transferred and deposited into the special
fund pursuant to section 453‑8.8, no less than fifty per cent of the
total amount of assessment fees deposited shall be used for purposes identified
by the Hawaii medical education council to support physician workforce
assessment and planning efforts, including the recruitment and retention of
physicians, for rural and medically underserved areas of the State; provided
further that expenditures from the special fund shall be limited to no more
than $245,000 annually. This shall include but not be limited to maintaining
accurate physician workforce assessment information and providing or updating
personal and professional information, that shall be maintained in a secure
database. The John A. Burns school of medicine may disclose information
specific to any physician only with the express written consent of that
physician. [L Sp 2009, c 18, §2; am L 2012, c 186, §1]

Note

Disbursements to fund (repealed June 30, 2017). L Sp 2009, c
18, §4; L 2012, c 186, §3(2).

Physician workforce assessment report to legislature
beginning 2011 and every year thereafter. L Sp 2009, c 18, §5; L 2012, c 186, §3(1).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next